Hawaii statutes.
[§443B-16] Harassment and abuse. No
collection agency shall oppress, harass, or abuse any person in connection with
the collection of or attempt to collect any claim alleged to be due and owing
by that person or another in any of the following ways:

(1) The use of profane or obscene language that is
intended to abuse the hearer or reader;

(2) The placement of telephone calls without
disclosure of the caller's identity or with the intent to harass, or threaten
any person at the called number; and

(3) Causing expense to any person in the form of long
distance telephone tolls, telegram fees, or other charge incurred by a medium
of communication, by concealment of the true purpose of the notice, letter,
message, or communication. [L 1987, c 191, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next